Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-12,108
Costs of removal and storage; last-registered owner; liable.

The last-registered owner of an abandoned motorboat shall be liable to the local authority or state agency for the costs of removal and storage of such motorboat.

Laws 2004, LB 560, § 21.